apertium-mar.mar.dix
		<pardef n="लिह/ी__vblex">
			<!-- infinitives -->
			<e> 		<p><l>िण</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><j/></r></p><par n="__inf_endings"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>रणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ा</l><r>रणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ुया</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="hort"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">  <p><l>ुयात</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="hort"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>         <p><l>ायला</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ित</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ितो</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िते</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ितो</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ितोस</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ितेस</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िता</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ितो</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िते</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िते</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ितात</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			
			<e> 		<p><l>िलो</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िले</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िलो</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>िला</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िलास</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िली</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िलीस</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िला</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िलात</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>	
			<e> 		<p><l>िल्या</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िल्यात</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िले</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>िला</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िली</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िले</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िलं</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िले</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िलेत</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िल्या</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िल्यात</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िली</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िलीत</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>ीन</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ू</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>िशील</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ाल</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ेल</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ितील</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>िणार</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<!-- habitual -->
			<e>			<p><l>ायचो</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r='LR'>	<p><l>ायचा</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>ायची</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>ायचो</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>ायचे</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>ायच्या</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>			<p><l>ायचा</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>ायचास</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>ायची</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>ायचीस</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>ायचा</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>ायचात</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>ायचे</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>ायचेत</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>ायच्या</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>ायच्यात</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>			<p><l>ायचा</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>ायची</l><r>िणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

		<e lm="लिही">                    	<i>लिह</i><par n="लिह/ी__vblex" /></e>
